Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-602
Assessments paid by state; subrogation; collection.

In the event the apportionment and assessments so levied have been paid by the state, the state or the fund from which payments have been made shall be subrogated to all the rights and remedies of the drainage district for the collection of the assessments and levies against lessees or their heirs or assigns.

Laws 1925, c. 17, § 3, p. 87;

C.S.1929, § 31-702;

R.S.1943, § 31-602;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 2.